Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2484
Sections, liberal construction.

Sections 18-2401 to 18-2485, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be construed liberally to effect its purposes.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 84.